Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 114.510 is amended to read:
114.510. (1) A  person who meets the requirements of ORS 114.515 may file a simple estate affi-
davit only with regard to an estate in which:
(a)(A) Not more than $75,000 of the fair  market value of the estate is attributable to personal
property  other than manufactured homes ; and
(B) Not more than $200,000 of the  fair market value of the estate is attributable to the com-
bined fair market value of  real property  and manufactured homes ; or
(b) The decedent died testate and:
(A) Not more than $75,000  of the fair market value of the estate is attributable to specifically
devised personal property  other than manufactured homes ;
(B) Not more than $200,000 of the fair market value of  the estate is attributable to specifically
devised real property  and manufactured homes ; and
(C) The balance of the  fair market value of the estate is attributable to property that is devised
to the trustee  of a trust of which the decedent was a settlor, as defined in ORS 130.010, and which
came into existence prior to the decedent’s date of death.
(2)(a) The fair market value of the estate under subsection (1) of this  section shall be deter-
mined:
(A) As of the date of death; or
(B) If the date of death is more than one year before the date of filing  of the affidavit, as of a
date within 45 days before the filing of the affidavit.
(b) In determining fair market value under this subsection, the fair  market value of the entire
interest in the property included in the estate shall be used without reduction for  liens or other
debts.
(3) As used  in this section, “manufactured home” means a structure constructed for
movement on the public highways that has  sleeping, cooking and plumbing facilities, that is
intended for human occupancy, that is being used  for residential purposes and that was
constructed in accordance with federal manufactured housing construction and safety
standards and regulations in effect at the time of construction.
SECTION 1a.
If Senate Bill 168 becomes law, section 1 of this 2025 Act (amending ORS
114.510) is  repealed and ORS 114.510, as amended by section 2, chapter 34, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 168), is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 15 (SB 15-B) Page 1
114.510. (1) A  person who meets the requirements of ORS 114.515 may file a simple estate affi-
davit only with regard to an estate in which:
(a)(A) Not more than $75,000 of the fair  market value of the estate is attributable to personal
property  other than manufactured homes ; and
(B) Not more than $200,000 of the  fair market value of the estate is attributable to  the com-
bined fair market value of  real property  and manufactured homes ; or
(b) The decedent died testate and:
(A) Not more than $75,000 of the fair market value of the estate  is attributable to personal
property other than manufactured homes  that is specifically devised  to devisees other than the
trustee of a trust described in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;
(B) Not more than $200,000 of the fair market value  of the estate is attributable to real property
and manufactured  homes  that is specifically devised to devisees other than the trustee of a trust
described in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph; and
(C) The balance of the  fair market value of the estate is attributable to property that is devised
to the trustee of a trust of which the decedent was a settlor, as defined in ORS 130.010,  and which
came into existence prior to the decedent’s date of death.
(2)(a) The fair market value  of the estate under subsection (1) of this section shall be deter-
mined:
(A) As of the date of death; or
(B) If the date of death is  more than one year before the date of filing of the affidavit, as of a
date within 45 days before the filing of the affidavit.
(b) In determining fair market value  under this subsection, the fair market value of the entire
interest in the property  included in the estate shall be used without reduction for liens or other
debts.
(3) As used in this section, “manufactured home” means a structure  constructed for
movement on the public highways that has sleeping,  cooking and plumbing facilities, that is
intended for human occupancy, that is being  used for residential purposes and that was
constructed in accordance with federal manufactured housing construction and safety
standards and regulations in effect at the time of construction.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 114.510 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to es-
tates of decedents dying on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2a.  If Senate Bill 168 becomes law, section 2 of this 2025 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  The amendments to ORS 114.510 by section [ 1] 1a of this 2025 Act apply to estates of
decedents dying on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 15 (SB 15-B) Page 2
Passed by Senate April 3, 2025
Repassed by Senate June 9, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 15 (SB 15-B) Page 3